Hawaii, session 2026, GM1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 159, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§159- Further exemptions; food donations; axis deer
meat; pilot program. (a) There is established an axis deer
meat donation pilot program to allow hunters to donate meat or
meat products derived from axis deer to a charitable, religious,
or nonprofit organization for the purpose of feeding those in
need without regard to this chapter.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to the slaughtering of
axis deer or the preparation and transportation of the
carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products derived from
axis deer at establishments conducting these operations if the
articles are exclusively to be donated by a hunter for the use
or distribution by a charitable, religious, or nonprofit
organization to feed needy persons pursuant to chapter 145D;
provided that the meat or meat products derived from axis deer
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO
iniiiMniiiiiiiiHnniii

Page 2 1334
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
shall not be combined with a meat food product regulated under
the Federal Meat Inspection Act, title 21 United States Code
section 601 et seq., or a poultry product regulated under the
federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, title 21 United States
Code section 451 et seq.; provided further that the
transportation of the carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat
products derived from axis deer shall be limited to moving the
carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products derived from
axis deer to and from the premises where the hunter killed the
axis deer; the processing establishment; and the charitable,
religious, or nonprofit organization feeding needy persons.
(c) A hunter shall successfully complete a training and
certification program established by the department of
agriculture and biosecurity, in consultation with the department
of health, regarding safe field dressing, disease
identification, and proper handling of the carcasses, parts
thereof, and meat or meat products derived from axis deer prior
to donating meat or meat products derived from axis deer
pursuant to this section.
(d) The axis deer meat donation pilot program established
pursuant to this section shall be operative on an island with a
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO. £3
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
population over one hundred fifty thousand but less than two
hundred thousand; provided that if a recognized outbreak of a
known disease, as determined by the department of agriculture
and biosecurity, exists in the pilot program location, the pilot
program shall not continue until the outbreak is resolved, as
determined by the department.
(e) For the purposes of this section, "axis deer" means
the species scientifically known as Axis axis."
SECTION 2. Section 145D-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§145D-5 Reserving the State's authority to regulate,
inspect, or ban the use of donated food. [Ne-thing in]
Notwithstanding section 159- , this chapter is not intended to
restrict the authority of the department of health or the
department of agriculture and biosecurity to regulate, inspect,
or ban the use of [-sneht] donated foods for human consumption."
SECTION 3. Section 159-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Meat or meat products derived from axis deer" means any
product capable of use as human food which is made wholly or in
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO
iniiniiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
^3
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
part from any meat or other portions of the carcass of any axis
deer, excepting products that contain meat or other portions of
the carcasses only in a relatively small proportion or
historically have not been considered by consumers as products
of the meat food industry, and that are exempted from the
definition as meat products by the board under the conditions as
it may prescribe to assure that the meat or other portions of
the carcasses contained in the products are not adulterated and
that the products are not represented as meat products.”
SECTION 4. Section 159-29, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The transportation by commercial carrier of
carcasses, parts thereof, or meat or meat products produced
without inspection under subsection (a) [ie] shall be
prohibited, except under permit issued by the board[—] and
carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products derived from
axis deer that are exempt from this chapter under section
159-
SECTION 5. Section 159-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO 4
lilllllllllHIHIIIIilllllllllllil

Page 5
H.B. NO.
^3
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
"(a) [The] Notwithstanding section 159- , the
preparation, sale, offering for sale, or transportation or
receipt for transportation in intrastate commerce of meat and
meat products derived from exotic animals, unless inspected and
• 5 passed as provided for under this part, [ie] shall be
prohibited. Violators shall be subject to all requirements and
penalties of this chapter."
SECTION 6. The department of agriculture and biosecurity
and department of health shall jointly submit a report to the
legislature on the axis deer meat donation pilot program
established pursuant to section 159- , Hawaii Revised
Statutes, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session. The report shall include:
(1) An update on the implementation and outcomes of the
pilot program;
(2) The number of participating hunters; charitable,
religious, or nonprofit organizations; and processing
establishments;
(3) Any public health or safety concerns identified;
(4) An assessment of current and future resource needs,
including staffing requirements; and
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO

liiiiiiiiiiHBiiiiiiiiiin

Psge 6 II |k I 1334
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(5) Any other findings and recommendations, including
proposed legislation.
SECTION 7. The department of agriculture and biosecurity
shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, to implement this Act, including rules establishing
training, certification, and inspection requirements necessary
for the implementation of the axis deer meat donation pilot
program established pursuant to section 159- , Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that:
(1) Sections 1 through 6 shall take effect on July 1,
2028; and
(2) On June 30, 2033, this Act shall be repealed and
sections 145D-5, 159-3, and 159-34, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they
read on the day prior to the effective date of this
Act.
2026-3518 HB1334 CD2 HMSO

1334
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1334, HD 3, SD 2, CD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1334, H.D. 3, S.D. 2, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate